Missouri, session 2026, HB1621.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 182.802, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 182.802, to read as follows:
182.802. 1. (1) Any public library district located in any of the following counties
may impose a tax as provided in this section:
(a) At least partially within any county of the third classification without a township
form of government and with more than forty thousand eight hundred but fewer than forty
thousand nine hundred inhabitants;
(b) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than thirteen thousand five hundred but fewer than thirteen thousand six hundred
inhabitants;
(c) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than thirteen thousand two hundred but fewer than thirteen thousand three hundred
inhabitants;
(d) Any county of the third classification with a township form of government and
with more than twenty-nine thousand seven hundred but fewer than twenty-nine thousand
eight hundred inhabitants;
(e) Any county of the second classification with more than nineteen thousand seven
hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand eight hundred inhabitants;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1621 2
(f) Any county of the third classification with a township form of government and
with more than thirty-three thousand one hundred but fewer than thirty-three thousand two
hundred inhabitants;
(g) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants and with a city
of the third classification with more than six thousand but fewer than seven thousand
inhabitants as the county seat;
(h) Any county of the fourth classification with more than twenty thousand but fewer
than thirty thousand inhabitants; [or]
(i) Any county of the third classification with more than thirteen thousand nine
hundred but fewer than fourteen thousand inhabitants;
(j) Any county with more than four hundred thousand but fewer than five
hundred thousand inhabitants;
(k) Any county with more than two hundred thousand but fewer than two
hundred thirty thousand inhabitants;
(l) Any county with more than one hundred thousand but fewer than one
hundred twenty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than twelve
thousand but fewer than fourteen thousand inhabitants;
(m) Any county with more than one hundred thousand but fewer than one
hundred twenty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than nine
thousand but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants;
(n) Any county with more than eighty thousand but fewer than one hundred
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than seventy thousand but fewer
than eighty thousand inhabitants;
(o) Any county with more than eighty thousand but fewer than one hundred
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than twenty thousand but fewer
than twenty-five thousand inhabitants;
(p) Any county with more than two hundred sixty thousand but fewer than three
hundred thousand inhabitants;
(q) Any county with more than one hundred twenty thousand but fewer than one
hundred fifty thousand inhabitants;
(r) Any county with more than eighty thousand but fewer than one hundred
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than thirteen thousand but
fewer than seventeen thousand inhabitants;
(s) Any county with more than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand
inhabitants;

HB 1621 3
(t) Any county with more than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than ten thousand but fewer than twelve
thousand six hundred inhabitants;
(u) Any county with more than eight thousand nine hundred but fewer than nine
thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than five thousand
but fewer than six thousand inhabitants;
(v) Any county with more than fourteen thousand but fewer than fifteen
thousand seven hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than eight
thousand but fewer than ten thousand inhabitants;
(w) Any county with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer
than ten thousand inhabitants;
(x) Any county with more than fourteen thousand but fewer than fifteen
thousand seven hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two
thousand but fewer than three thousand inhabitants;
(y) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than one thousand four hundred
but fewer than one thousand nine hundred inhabitants;
(z) Any county with more than eight thousand nine hundred but fewer than nine
thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than one thousand
but fewer than two thousand inhabitants;
(aa) Any county with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than
fourteen thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four thousand but
fewer than five thousand inhabitants;
(bb) Any county with more than eight thousand but fewer than eight thousand
nine hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three hundred but
fewer than six hundred inhabitants;
(cc) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than one hundred but fewer
than five hundred inhabitants;
(dd) Any county with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than five thousand but fewer
than eight thousand inhabitants;
(ee) Any county with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than ten thousand but fewer
than fourteen thousand inhabitants;

HB 1621 4
(ff) Any county with more than nineteen thousand but fewer than twenty-two
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than one thousand but fewer
than two thousand two hundred twenty inhabitants;
(gg) Any county with more than fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than
seventeen thousand six hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
seven thousand but fewer than nine thousand inhabitants;
(hh) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-
five thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than nine hundred but
fewer than one thousand four hundred inhabitants;
(ii) Any county with more than eight thousand but fewer than eight thousand
nine hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than eight hundred but
100 fewer than one thousand three hundred inhabitants;
101 (jj) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five
102 thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than nine thousand but fewer
103 than twelve thousand five hundred inhabitants;
104 (kk) Any county with more than thirty thousand but fewer than thirty-five
105 thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two thousand but fewer
106 than three thousand eight hundred inhabitants;
107 (ll) Any county with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty
108 thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two thousand but fewer
109 than five thousand inhabitants;
110 (mm) Any county with more than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand
111 inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer than seven
112 thousand inhabitants;
113 (nn) Any county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty thousand
114 inhabitants and with a county seat with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than
115 twenty-one thousand inhabitants;
116 (oo) Any county with more than seventeen thousand six hundred but fewer than
117 nineteen thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four thousand but
118 fewer than five thousand fifty inhabitants;
119 (pp) Any county with more than nineteen thousand but fewer than twenty-two
120 thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two thousand five hundred
121 but fewer than four thousand inhabitants;
122 (qq) Any county with more than seventeen thousand six hundred but fewer than
123 nineteen thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than eight thousand
124 but fewer than ten thousand inhabitants;

HB 1621 5
125 (rr) Any county with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty
126 thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than five hundred but fewer
127 than two thousand inhabitants;
128 (ss) Any county with more than nine thousand nine hundred but fewer than
129 eleven thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than six hundred but
130 fewer than one thousand inhabitants;
131 (tt) Any county with more than twenty-five thousand but fewer than thirty
132 thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two thousand five hundred
133 but fewer than six thousand inhabitants;
134 (uu) Any county with more than twenty-five thousand but fewer than thirty
135 thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than fourteen thousand but
136 fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants;
137 (vv) Any county with more than fourteen thousand but fewer than fifteen
138 thousand seven hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four
139 thousand five hundred fifty but fewer than four thousand nine hundred inhabitants;
140 (ww) Any county with more than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand
141 inhabitants and with a county seat with more than seventeen thousand but fewer than
142 twenty-one thousand inhabitants;
143 (xx) Any county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty thousand
144 inhabitants and with a county seat with more than twenty-one thousand but fewer than
145 thirty-one thousand inhabitants; or
146 (yy) Any county with more than thirty thousand but fewer than thirty-five
147 thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three thousand eight
148 hundred but fewer than six thousand inhabitants.
149 (2) (a) Any public library district listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection may, by
150 a majority vote of its board of directors, impose a tax not to exceed one-half of one cent on all
151 retail sales subject to taxation under sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the purpose of funding
152 the operation and maintenance of public libraries within the boundaries of such library
153 district. If the board of directors approves submitting a sales tax to the voters of the
154 library district, the governing body of the county shall comply.
155 (b) The tax authorized by this subsection shall be in addition to all other taxes
156 allowed by law. No tax under this subsection shall become effective unless the board of
157 directors submits to the voters of the district, at a county or state general, primary or special
158 election, a proposal to authorize the tax, and such tax shall become effective only after the
159 majority of the voters voting on such tax approve such tax.
160 2. In the event the district seeks to impose a sales tax under this subsection, the
161 question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:

HB 1621 6
162 Shall a ______ cent sales tax be levied on all retail sales within the
163 district for the purpose of providing funding for ______ library
164 district?
165 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
166
167 If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
168 favor of the proposal, then the tax shall become effective. If a majority of the votes cast by
169 the qualified voters voting are opposed to the proposal, then the board of directors shall have
170 no power to impose the tax unless and until another proposal to authorize the tax is submitted
171 to the voters of the district and such proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
172 voting thereon. The provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply to any tax approved
173 under this subsection.
174 3. As used in this section, "qualified voters" or "voters" means any individuals
175 residing within the district who are eligible to be registered voters and who have registered to
176 vote under chapter 115, or, if no individuals are eligible and registered to vote reside within
177 the proposed district, all of the owners of real property located within the proposed district
178 who have unanimously petitioned for or consented to the adoption of an ordinance by the
179 governing body imposing a tax authorized in this section. If the owner of the property within
180 the proposed district is a political subdivision or corporation of the state, the governing body
181 of such political subdivision or corporation shall be considered the owner for purposes of this
182 section.
183 4. For purposes of this section the term "public library district" shall mean any city
184 library district, county library district, city-county library district, municipal library district,
185 consolidated library district, or urban library district.
✔